apertium_magahi_in_canonical_form.dix
<pardef n="cor/a__n">
    <e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:na"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>iye</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:na"/><s n="num:na"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ave</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ani</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>avana</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>aniana</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>aniye</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>aniane</l><r>a<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    
</pardef>

<pardef n="pak/kA__n">
    <e><p><l>kA</l><r>kA<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>avana</l><r>kA<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="jaMgal/A__n">
    <e><p><l>A</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>avana</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ave</l><r>A<s n="cat:n"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="ham/a__p">
    <e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>mara</l><r>a<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:gen"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>arA</l><r>a<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ani</l><r>a<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="w/u__p">
    <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ora</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:gen"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ora</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:gen"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ora</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>orA</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ohani</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:m"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/u__p">
    <e><p><l>u</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>okra</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:gen"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>okarA</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>unakara</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:gen"/><s n="per:a_h1"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>unkarA</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="per:a_h1"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>u_saba</l><r>u<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="/i__p">
    <e><p><l>i</l><r>i<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ekara</l><r>i<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:gen"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>ekarA</l><r>i<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>i_saba</l><r>i<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:d"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:p"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>inkara</l><r>i<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:gen"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
    <e><p><l>inkarA</l><r>i<s n="cat:p"/><s n="case:o"/><s n="per:a_h1"/><s n="num:s"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="cor"><i>cor</i><par n="cor/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="pak"><i>pak</i><par n="pak/kA__n"/></e>
<e lm="jaMgal"><i>jaMgal</i><par n="jaMgal/A__n"/></e>
<e lm="ham"><i>ham</i><par n="ham/a__p"/></e>
<e lm="w"><i>w</i><par n="w/u__p"/></e>
<e lm="u"><i></i><par n="/u__p"/></e>
<e lm="i"><i></i><par n="/i__p"/></e>
